src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k9x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: súgvur
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: súgv
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: súgi
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: súgs
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: súgvurin
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: súgvin
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: súginum
    súgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: súgsins
